Utah statutes.
73-12-3.   Description of land.

The lands subject to this act are located in Utah county, state of Utah, and are described as follows, to wit:

All lands in the bed or on the margin of Utah Lake below elevation 4491.0 (U.S. Coast and Geodetic Survey Adjusted Datum 1922) within the following described boundary:

Beginning at the west quarter corner of sec. 19, T. 5 S., R. 1 E., S.L.B.&M., and running thence three miles east to the east quarter corner sec. 21, T. 5 S., R. 1 E.; thence one half mile south to southeast corner sec. 21, T. 5 S., R. 1 E.; thence one and one half miles east to south quarter corner sec. 23, T. 5 S., R. 1 E.; thence one mile south to south quarter corner sec. 26, T. 5 S., R. 1 E.; thence two and one-half miles east to northeast corner sec. 31, T. 5 S., R. 2 E.; thence four miles south to southeast corner sec. 18, T. 6 S., R. 2 E.; thence one mile east to northeast corner sec. 20, T. 6 S., R. 2 E.; thence one mile south to southeast corner sec. 20, T. 6 S., R. 2 E.; thence one mile east to northeast corner sec. 28, T. 6 S., R. 2 E.; thence three miles south to northeast corner sec. 9, T. 7 S., R. 2 E.; thence one mile east to northeast corner sec. 10, T. 7 S., R. 2 E.; thence one mile south to southeast corner sec. 10, T. 7 S., R. 2 E.; thence three miles east to northeast corner sec. 18, T. 7 S., R. 3 E.; thence four miles south to southeast corner sec. 31, T. 7 S., R. 3 E.; thence three and one-half miles west to south quarter corner sec. 34, T. 7 S., R. 2 E.; thence one-half mile south to center of sec. 3, T. 8 S., R. 2 E.; thence one and one-half miles west to east quarter corner sec. 5, T. 8 S., R. 2 E.; thence one mile south to east quarter corner sec. 8, T. 8 S., R. 2 E.; thence one and one-half miles west to center of sec. 7, T. 8 S., R. 2 E.; thence one and one-half miles south to south quarter corner sec. 18, T. 8 S., R. 2 E.; thence four and one-half miles west to northeast corner sec. 20, T. 8 S., R. 1 E.; thence four miles south to southeast corner sec. 5, T. 9 S., R. 1 E.; thence one mile west to southwest corner sec. 5, T. 9 S., R. 1 E.; thence three miles south to southeast corner sec. 19, T. 9 S., R. 1 E.; thence four and one-half miles west to south quarter corner sec. 21, T. 9 S., R. 1 W.; thence 11 miles north to north quarter corner sec. 33, T. 7 S., R. 1 W.; thence one and one-half miles east to northeast corner sec. 34, T. 7 S., R. 1 W.; thence one mile north to northwest corner sec. 26, T. 7 S., R. 1 W.; thence one-half mile, more or less, east to southwest corner sec. 24, T. 7 S., R. 1 W.; thence one mile north to northwest corner sec. 24, T. 7 S., R. 1 W.; thence one mile, more or less, east to northeast corner sec. 24, T. 7 S., R. 1 W.; thence seven miles north to northwest corner sec. 18, T. 6 S., R 1 E.; thence one mile west to southwest corner sec. 12, T. 6 S., R. 1 W.; thence two miles north to northwest corner sec. 1, T. 6 S., R. 1 W.; thence one-half mile west to south quarter corner sec. 35, T. 5 S., R. 1 W.; thence two and one-half miles north to center sec. 23, T. 5 S., R. 1 W.; thence one and one-half miles east to west quarter corner sec. 19, T. 5 S., R. 1 E. to the point of beginning.

